District of Columbia statutes.
15-362

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“Foreign country” means a government other than:

(A)

The United States;

(B)

The District of Columbia, a state, district, commonwealth, territory, or insular possession of the United States; or

(C)

Any other government with regard to which the decision in the District of Columbia as to whether to recognize a judgment of that government’s courts is initially subject to determination under the Full Faith and Credit Clause of the United States Constitution.

(2)

“Foreign-country judgment” means a judgment of a court of a foreign country.

Feb. 24, 2012, D.C. Law 19-86, § 2(b), 58 DCR 11186
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 2 of the Uniform Foreign-Country Money Judgments Recognition Act.